Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-922
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Negotiated Rulemaking Act is to establish a framework for the conduct of negotiated rulemaking consistent with the Administrative Procedure Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that state agencies, whenever appropriate, use the negotiated rulemaking process to resolve controversial issues prior to the commencement of the formal rulemaking process of the Administrative Procedure Act. Negotiated rulemaking is not a substitute for the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act but may be used as a supplemental procedure to permit the direct participation of affected interests in the development of new rules or the amendment or repeal of existing rules. A consensus agreement on a proposed rule reached by a negotiated rulemaking committee may be modified by an agency as a result of the subsequent formal rulemaking process. This section shall not be construed as an attempt to limit innovation and experimentation with the negotiated rulemaking process.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 2.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.